Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-402
Game and Parks Commission; Rock Creek Fish Hatchery; modernize.

The Game and Parks Commission is hereby authorized to modernize the Rock Creek Fish Hatchery pursuant to the 1974 Study of the Nebraska State Fish Hatchery System and Addendums prepared by such commission.

Laws 1978, LB 586, § 1.